Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2144
Director or officer; administrative penalty; when.

Any director or officer of an insurance holding company system who knowingly violates or assents to or permits any officer or agent of the insurer to violate the requirements of subsection (1) of section 44-2132 or section 44-2133 or 44-2134 may be required by the director, after notice and hearing, to pay in his or her individual capacity an administrative penalty of not more than five thousand dollars per violation. In determining the amount of the penalty, the director shall take into account the appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the gravity of the violation, the history of previous violations, and such other matters as justice may require.

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 24.